Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.510 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 283 crossing over Elm Fork Red River
north of Mangum in Greer County shall be designated as the “MoMM2
Arlon Francis Wetsel Memorial Bridge”. The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 16, 2026 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1599 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)